bg-BG: Съвместим тип предно стъкло: Фиксирано предно стъкло; Сгъваемо предно стъкло; Без предно стъкло; Разделено/сгъваемо предно стъкло; Универсална съвместимост с предни стъкла; Друг
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta vjetrobranskog stakla: Fiksno vjetrobransko staklo; Sklopivo vjetrobransko staklo; Bez vjetrobranskog stakla; Dvodijelno/sklopivo vjetrobransko staklo; Univerzalna kompatibilnost vjetrobranskog stakla; Ostalo
el: Συμβατός τύπος παρμπρίζ: Σταθερό παρμπρίζ; Αναδιπλούμενο παρμπρίζ; Χωρίς παρμπρίζ; Διαιρούμενο/αναδιπλούμενο παρμπρίζ; Συμβατότητα με παρμπρίζ γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
sv: Kompatibel vindrutetyp: Fast vindruta; Nedfällbar vindruta; Ingen vindruta; Delad/vikbar vindruta; Universell vindrutekompatibilitet; Övrigt
ko: 호환되는 앞유리 유형: 고정식 윈드실드; 접이식 윈드실드; 윈드실드 없음; 분할/접이식 윈드실드; 범용 윈드실드 호환성; 기타
ro-RO: Tip de parbriz compatibil: Parbriz fix; Parbriz rabatabil; Fără parbriz; Parbriz divizat/pliabil; Compatibilitate universală cu parbrizele; Altele
es: Tipo de parabrisas compatible: Parabrisas fijo; Parabrisas abatible; Sin parabrisas; Parabrisas dividido/plegable; Compatibilidad universal de parabrisas; Otro
de: Kompatibler Windschutzscheibentyp: Feste Windschutzscheibe; Klappbare Windschutzscheibe; Keine Windschutzscheibe; Geteilte/klappbare Windschutzscheibe; Universelle Windschutzscheiben-Kompatibilität; Sonstige
da: Kompatibel forrudetype: Fast forrude; Nedklappelig forrude; Ingen forrude; Delt/sammenklappelig forrude; Universel forrudekompatibilitet; Andet
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ čelného skla: Pevné čelné sklo; Sklopné čelné sklo; Bez čelného skla; Delené/sklopné čelné sklo; Univerzálna kompatibilita čelných skiel; Iné
th: ประเภทกระจกหน้ารถที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: กระจกบังลมแบบยึดติดตายตัว; กระจกบังลมแบบพับลงได้; ไม่มีกระจกบังลม; กระจกบังลมแบบแยก/พับได้; รองรับกระจกบังลมอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại kính chắn gió tương thích: Kính chắn gió cố định; Kính chắn gió gập xuống; Không có kính chắn gió; Kính chắn gió chia đôi/gập; Tương thích mọi kính chắn gió; Khác
lt-LT: Suderinamas priekinio stiklo tipas: Fiksuotas priekinis stiklas; Nulenkiamas priekinis stiklas; Be priekinio stiklo; Padalintas / sulankstomas priekinis stiklas; Universalus priekinio stiklo suderinamumas; Kita
zh-TW: 相容的擋風玻璃類型: 固定式擋風玻璃; 可折疊式擋風玻璃; 無擋風玻璃; 分離/折疊式擋風玻璃; 通用擋風玻璃相容性; 其他
hu: Kompatibilis szélvédőtípus: Fix szélvédő; Lehajtható szélvédő; Nincs szélvédő; Osztott/összecsukható szélvédő; Univerzális szélvédő-kompatibilitás; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de para-brisas compatível: Para-brisas fixo; Para-brisas rebatível; Sem para-brisas; Para-brisas dividido/rebatível; Compatibilidade de para-brisas universal; Outro
ja: 互換性のあるフロントガラスタイプ: 固定式フロントガラス; 可倒式フロントガラス; フロントガラスなし; 分割/折りたたみ式フロントガラス; ユニバーサルフロントガラス対応; その他
fr: Type de pare-brise compatible: Pare-brise fixe; Pare-brise rabattable; Sans pare-brise; Pare-brise en deux parties/pliant; Compatibilité universelle de pare-brise; Autre
zh-CN: 适用的挡风玻璃类型: 固定式挡风玻璃; 折叠式挡风玻璃; 无挡风玻璃; 分体式/折叠式挡风玻璃; 兼容所有挡风玻璃; 其他
tr: Uyumlu ön cam tipi: Sabit ön cam; Katlanabilir ön cam; Ön cam yok; Bölünmüş/katlanabilir ön cam; Evrensel ön cam uyumluluğu; Diğer
it: Tipo di parabrezza compatibile: Parabrezza fisso; Parabrezza ribaltabile; Nessun parabrezza; Parabrezza diviso/pieghevole; Compatibilità parabrezza universale; Altro
nb: Kompatibel frontrutetype: Fast vindskjerm; Nedfellbar vindskjerm; Ingen vindskjerm; Delt / nedfellbar vindskjerm; Universell vindskjermkompatibilitet; Annet
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta vetrobranskega stekla: Fiksno vetrobransko steklo; Zložljivo vetrobransko steklo; Brez vetrobranskega stekla; Deljeno/zložljivo vetrobransko steklo; Univerzalna združljivost z vetrobranskim steklom; Drugo
pl: Kompatybilny typ szyby przedniej: Szyba przednia stała; Szyba przednia składana w dół; Brak szyby przedniej; Szyba przednia dzielona/składana; Kompatybilność z uniwersalną szybą przednią; Inne
cs: Kompatibilní typ čelního skla: Pevné čelní sklo; Sklopné čelní sklo; Bez čelního skla; Dělené/skládací čelní sklo; Univerzální kompatibilita čelních skel; Jiné
nl: Compatibel type voorruit: Vaste voorruit; Neerklapbare voorruit; Geen voorruit; Gedeelde/neerklapbare voorruit; Universele compatibiliteit met voorruiten; Overige
fi: Yhteensopiva tuulilasin tyyppi: Kiinteä tuulilasi; Alaskäännettävä tuulilasi; Ei tuulilasia; Jaettu / taitettava tuulilasi; Universaali tuulilasin yhteensopivuus; Muu
ru: Совместимый тип ветрового стекла: Фиксированное ветровое стекло; Откидное ветровое стекло; Без ветрового стекла; Раздельное/складное ветровое стекло; Универсальная совместимость с ветровыми стеклами; Другое
en: Compatible windshield type: Fixed windshield; Fold-down windshield; No windshield; Split/folding windshield; Universal windshield compatibility; Other
pt-BR: Tipo de para-brisa compatível: Para-brisa fixo; Para-brisa dobrável para baixo; Sem para-brisa; Para-brisa bipartido/dobrável; Compatibilidade de para-brisa universal; Outro